Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2408
Postsecondary institution; authorization
to operate required.

Except as provided in section 85-2407,
no postsecondary institution shall operate in the State of Nebraska
by establishing a physical presence in this state
until it has received an authorization
to operate by the commission.

Laws 2011, LB637, § 8;

Laws 2012, LB1104, § 16.